District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.05

Inspection and audit of books and records.

The Mayor shall require a permittee to maintain specific books, records, and accounts. All books, records, and accounts of any permittee may be inspected by the Mayor, and may be inspected and audited by the District of Columbia Inspector General in order to determine whether the permittee has paid or will pay all amounts properly owed under any permit issued pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 605, 43 DCR 4569
1981 Ed., § 7-1075.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1141.01.
See notes to § 10-1141.01.